Wyoming, session 2025, HB0008.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-13-101(a)(i) is amended to read:

21-13-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter:

(i) "Average daily membership" or "ADM" means
the aggregate number of pupils present plus the aggregate
number of pupils absent, divided by the actual number of
HB0008

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0184
days the school is in session for the year. Pupils who
attend at least eighty percent (80%) seventy-five percent
(75%) of a full time equivalency basis shall be considered
full time. For pupils enrolled in school on less than
eighty percent (80%) seventy-five percent (75%) of a full
time equivalency basis, the school district shall calculate
the pupil's contribution to the ADM on a prorated basis
with the hours or class periods of enrollment being the
numerator and the hours or class periods of full time
equivalency being the denominator. Pupils who have
withdrawn from school or who have been absent for more than
ten (10) consecutive calendar days shall not be counted as
members;

Section 2. This act shall apply beginning school year
2025-2026.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0008